Maryland, session 2026, HB0384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
12–106.
NOTWITHSTANDING MARYLAND RULE 2–202, A MINOR WHO IS THE PARENT
OF A CHILD HAS THE CAPACITY AND RIGHT TO INITIATE OR DEFEND AN ACTION FOR
CHILD SUPPORT, WHETHER PENDENTE LITE OR PERMANENTLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0384*